Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8314
Violation; unfair trade practice; administrative penalty; fraudulent insurance act; restitution.

(1) A violation of the Discount Medical Plan Organization Act shall be an unfair trade practice under the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

(2) In addition to the penalties and other enforcement provisions of the Discount Medical Plan Organization Act, any person who willfully violates the act is subject to administrative penalties of up to one thousand dollars per violation.

(3) A person that willfully operates as or aids and abets another operating as a discount medical plan organization in violation of subsection (1) of section 44-8306 commits a fraudulent insurance act under section 28-631.

(4) A person that collects fees for purported membership in a discount medical plan but purposefully fails to provide the promised benefits commits a fraudulent insurance act under section 28-631. In addition, upon conviction, such person shall be ordered to pay restitution to persons aggrieved by the violation of the act. Restitution shall be ordered in addition to a fine or imprisonment, but not in lieu of such fine or imprisonment.

Laws 2008, LB855, § 46.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.